District of Columbia statutes.
38-731.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Financial literacy” means the ability to make informed decisions about one’s personal finances, based on an understanding of the principles of credit, debt, savings and investments, depository institutions, interest, and budgeting.

(2)

“Financial Literacy Council” means the District of Columbia Financial Literacy Council.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-209, § 2, 55 DCR 6979